Missouri, session 2026, HB2435.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 442.404, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 442.404, to read as follows:
442.404. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Homeowners' association", a nonprofit corporation or unincorporated association
of homeowners created under a declaration to own and operate portions of a planned
community or other residential subdivision that has the power under the declaration to assess
association members to pay the costs and expenses incurred in the performance of the
association's obligations under the declaration or tenants-in-common with respect to the
ownership of common ground or amenities of a planned community or other residential
subdivision. This term shall not include a condominium unit owners' association as defined
and provided for in subdivision (3) of section 448.1-103 or a residential cooperative;
(2) "Political signs", any fixed, ground-mounted display in support of or in opposition
to a person seeking elected office or a ballot measure excluding any materials that may be
attached;
(3) "Solar panel or solar collector", a device used to collect and convert solar energy
into electricity or thermal energy[,] including, but not limited to, photovoltaic cells or panels,
or solar thermal systems.
2. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running with
the land shall prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the display of political signs.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2435 2
(2) A homeowners' association has the authority to adopt reasonable rules, subject to
any applicable statutes or ordinances, regarding the time, size, place, number, and manner of
display of political signs.
(3) (a) A homeowners' association may remove a political sign without liability if
such sign:
a. Is placed within the common ground[,];
b. Threatens the public health or safety[,];
c. Violates an applicable statute or ordinance[,];
d. Is accompanied by sound or music[,]; or
e. If any other materials are attached to the political sign.
(b) Subject to [the foregoing] paragraph (a) of this subdivision, a homeowners'
association shall not remove a political sign from the property of a homeowner or impose any
fine or penalty upon the homeowner unless it has given such homeowner three days after
providing written notice to the homeowner, which notice shall specifically identify the rule
and the nature of the violation.
3. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running with
the land shall limit or prohibit, or have the effect of limiting or prohibiting, the installation of
solar panels or solar collectors on the rooftop of any property or structure.
(2) A homeowners' association may adopt reasonable rules, subject to any applicable
statutes or ordinances, regarding the placement of solar panels or solar collectors to the extent
that those rules do not:
(a) Prevent the installation of the device[,];
(b) Impair the functioning of the device[,];
(c) Restrict the use of the device[,]; or
(d) Adversely affect the cost or efficiency of the device.
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall apply only with regard to rooftops that are
owned, controlled, and maintained by the owner of the individual property or structure.
4. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running with
the land shall prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the display of sale signs on the
property of a homeowner or property owner including, but not limited to, any yard on the
property, or nearby street corners.
(2) A homeowners' association has the authority to adopt reasonable rules, subject to
any applicable statutes or ordinances, regarding the time, size, place, number, and manner of
display of sale signs.
(3) (a) A homeowners' association may remove a sale sign without liability if such
sign:
a. Is placed within the common ground[,];

HB 2435 3
b. Threatens the public health or safety[,];
c. Violates an applicable statute or ordinance[,];
d. Is accompanied by sound or music[,]; or
e. If any other materials are attached to the sale sign.
(b) Subject to [the foregoing] paragraph (a) of this subdivision, a homeowners'
association shall not remove a sale sign from the property of a homeowner or property owner
or impose any fine or penalty upon the homeowner or property owner unless it has given such
homeowner or property owner three business days after the homeowner or property owner
receives written notice from the homeowners' association, which notice shall specifically
identify the rule and the nature of the alleged violation.
5. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running with
the land shall prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting ownership or pasturing of up to six
chickens on a lot that is two-tenths of an acre or larger, including prohibitions against a single
chicken coop designed to accommodate up to six chickens.
(2) A homeowners' association may adopt reasonable rules, subject to applicable
statutes or ordinances, regarding ownership or pasturing of chickens, including a prohibition
or restriction on ownership or pasturing of roosters.
✔